Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-315
Commission; reciprocal agreements.

The commission may enter into agreements with other states bordering on the Missouri River providing for reciprocal recognition of licenses, permits, and laws of the agreeing states.

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 73.